Colorado statutes. TITLE 16 Criminal Proceedings
ARTICLE 8
INSANITY - RELEASE

Editor's note:

This article was repealed and reenacted in 1972. For historical information concerning the repeal and reenactment, see the editor's note before the article 1 heading.

Cross references:

For liability for the costs of the care and treatment of persons committed to the department of human services pursuant to this article 8, see § 27-92-101. For procedures related to determining competency to proceed, see article 8.5 of this title 16.

Law reviews:

For article, "

C

urrent

C

olorado Law on the Insanity Defense", see 24 Colo. Law. 1497 (1995); for article, "When Worlds Collide: Mentally Ill Criminal Defendants--Part I", see 29 Colo. Law. 57 (June 2000); "When Worlds Collide: Mentally Ill Criminal Defendants--Part II", see 29 Colo. Law. 101 (July 2000).

Section

PART 1 GENERAL PROVISIONS

PART 2 INTENSIVE TREATMENT
MANAGEMENT FOR PERSONS
WITH MENTAL ILLNESS

PART 3 COMPETENCY OF PERSONS
TO BE EXECUTED